Florida, session 2026, HB1251.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 11.063, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
11.063 Use of public funds for lobbying and discretionary
expenditure prohibited.—
(1) This section may be cited as the "Federalism
Protection Act."
(2) For purposes of this section, the term:
(a) "Elected official" means:
1. A member of the governing body of a county,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1251-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1251 2026
municipality, or any other political subdivision of this state;
or
2. An elected official chosen by the governing body of a
county, municipality, or any other political subdivision of this
state.
(b) "Local government" means:
1. A county, municipality, or any other political
subdivision of this state.
2. Any department, agency, board, bureau, district,
commission, authority, or similar body of a county, a
municipality, or any other political subdivision of the state.
(c) "Public funds" has the same meaning as s. 106.113(1).
(3)(a) A local government may not expend public funds to
retain a lobbyist for representation before the legislative or
executive branch. In addition, a person may not accept public
funds from a local government for lobbying.
(b) An elected official of a local government may not
expend or enter into a contract requiring expenditure of public
funds for any purpose not itemized in the budget of the local
government.
(c) This subsection does not apply to the expenditure of
public funds by a local government or an elected official for
the purpose of hiring of in-house staff.
(4) A person may file a written complaint with the
Commission on Ethics alleging a violation of this subsection.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1251-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1251 2026
The commission shall investigate and report its finding to the
President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and the Governor and Cabinet. The commission
shall adopt rules necessary to conduct investigations under this
paragraph.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1251-00